test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s63_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - koma: # 
    koma+V+Inf: koma
    koma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kemur
    koma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kom
    koma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: komu
    koma+V+Sup: komið
